test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-rooq_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - rǭʼ: # Noun 13 'eng /est raha/fin' - full paradigm
     rǭʼ+N+Sg+Nom: [rǭʼ, rǭ, rōʼ, rō]
     rǭʼ+N+Sg+Gen: [rǭʼ, rǭ, rōʼ, rō]
     rǭʼ+N+Sg+Par: [rǭʼdõ, rǭdõ, rōʼdõ, rōdõ]
     rǭʼ+N+Sg+Dat: [rǭʼn, rǭn, rōʼn, rōn]
     rǭʼ+N+Sg+Ins: [rǭʼkõks, rǭkõks, rōʼkõks, rōkõks]
     rǭʼ+N+Sg+Ill: [rǭʼzõ, rǭzõ, rōʼzõ, rōzõ]
     rǭʼ+N+Sg+Ela: [rǭʼstõ, rǭstõ, rōʼstõ, rōstõ]
     rǭʼ+N+Pl+Nom: [rǭʼd, rǭd, rōʼd, rōd]
     rǭʼ+N+Pl+Gen: [rǭʼd, rǭd, rōʼd, rōd]
     rǭʼ+N+Pl+Par: [rǭʼḑi, rǭḑi, rōʼḑi, rōḑi]
     rǭʼ+N+Pl+Dat: [rǭʼdõn, rǭdõn, rōʼdõn, rōdõn]
     rǭʼ+N+Pl+Ins: [rǭʼdkõks, rǭdkõks, rōʼdkõks, rōdkõks]
     rǭʼ+N+Pl+Ill: [rǭʼži, rǭži, rōʼži, rōži]
     rǭʼ+N+Pl+Ela: [rǭʼšti, rǭšti, rōʼšti, rōšti]
